Tennessee, session 114, SB1726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-39-402(d)(2), is amended by
deleting "seven (7) days" and substituting "seven (7) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1726
011425
- 1 -